Illinois, session 104th, HB3336.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 51A-70 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1A-70 new)7    Sec. 1A-70. Election income tax rebate fees. 8    (a) Beginning on January 1, 2026, the State Board of 9Elections shall create a payment system to collect fees from 10any prospective candidate for elected office in a consolidated 11or general election in this State in the following amounts:12        (1) $2,500 pre-filing fee to paid no later than the 13    first day petitions for nomination may be circulated; and14        (2) $2,5000 filing fee to be paid when the candidate 15    files nomination papers with an election authority.16    (b) The State Board of Elections shall adopt rules to 17require that all candidates for elected office certify payment 18of the fees required under this Section when the candidate 19files nominations papers with an election authority. An 20election authority shall not accept nomination papers that are 21not accompanied by the certification of payment.22    (c) The State Board of Elections shall deposit all moneys 23collected under this Section into the Election Income Tax   HB3336- 2 -LRB104 09071 SPS 19127 b1Rebate Fund.2    (d) All fees collected under this Section shall be in 3addition to any other fees collected under this Code. 4    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1030 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)7    Sec. 5.1030. The Election Income Tax Rebate Fund. 8    Section 15. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 9adding Section 208.7 as follows: 10    (35 ILCS 5/208.7 new)11    Sec. 208.7. Election income tax Rebate. 12    (a) The Election Income Tax Rebate Fund is created as a 13special fund in the State treasury. Moneys in the Fund shall be 14used for the purpose of paying rebates under this Section.15    (b) Beginning in 2027, the Department shall pay an annual 16rebate to each individual taxpayer who files an Illinois 17income tax return with the Department on or before the second 18Friday in October of the calendar year for which the rebate is 19made. Each person who is entitled to a rebate under this 20Section shall receive an equal portion of the moneys in the 21Election Income Tax Rebate Fund. By August 1 of each calendar 22year, the Department shall begin to certify to the   HB3336- 3 -LRB104 09071 SPS 19127 b1Comptroller, on a rolling basis, the names of the taxpayers 2who are eligible for a rebate under this Section, the amounts 3of those rebates, and any other information that the 4Comptroller requires to direct the payment of the rebates 5provided under this Section to taxpayers.6    (c) The amount of a rebate under this Section shall not be 7included in the taxpayer's income or resources for the 8purposes of determining eligibility or benefit level in any 9means-tested benefit program administered by a governmental 10entity unless required by federal law.